compiler/banglaStemming.sbl
stringescapes {}
//vowels
stringdef a    hex '0985'
stringdef aa    hex '0986'
stringdef i    hex '0987'
stringdef ii    hex '0988'
stringdef u    hex '0989'
stringdef uu    hex '098A'
stringdef e   hex '098E'
stringdef ai    hex '098AF'
stringdef o    hex '0993'
stringdef au   hex '0994'

//dependent vowel sign
stringdef akar   hex '098E'
stringdef rikar    hex '09BF'
stringdef dikar    hex '09C0'
stringdef rukar   hex '09C1'
stringdef dukar   hex '09C2'
stringdef ekar    hex '09C7'
stringdef oikar    hex '09C8'
stringdef okar   hex '09CB'
stringdef oukar   hex '09CC'


//consonants
stringdef ka    hex '0995'
stringdef kha    hex '0996'
stringdef ga    hex '0997'
stringdef gha    hex '0998'
stringdef nga    hex '0999'
stringdef ca    hex '099A'
stringdef cha   hex '099B'
stringdef ja    hex '099C'
stringdef jha    hex '099D'
stringdef nya   hex '099E'
stringdef tta    hex '099F'
stringdef ttha    hex '09A0'
stringdef dda    hex '09A1'
stringdef ddha    hex '09A2'
stringdef nna    hex '09A3'
stringdef ta    hex '09A4'
stringdef tha    hex '09A5'
stringdef da    hex '09A6'
stringdef dha    hex '09A7'
stringdef na    hex '09A8'
stringdef pa    hex '09AA'
stringdef pha   hex '09AB'
stringdef ba   hex '09AC'
stringdef bha   hex '09AD'
stringdef ma   hex '09AE'
stringdef ya hex '09AF'
stringdef ra    hex '09B0'
stringdef la    hex '09B2'
stringdef sha    hex '09B6'
stringdef ssa   hex '09B7'
stringdef sa   hex '09B8'
stringdef ha   hex '09B9'
stringdef rra   hex '09DC'
stringdef rha   hex '09DD'
stringdef yya   hex '09DF'

routines ( remove
			replace1
			replace2
)

externals ( stem )

define remove as (
	[substring] among(
        'i' (<- '')
        'o'(<- '')
        'Y' (<- '')
        '{okar}{ta}'  (<- '')
    )

)

define replace1 as (
	[substring] among(
        '{ra}{cha}' (<- 'ra')
        '{ra}{ba}'(<- 'ra')
    )
)


define replace2 as (

)

define stem as (
	do remove
	do replace1
	do replace2
)
